Tennessee, session 114, HB2461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 67, Chapter 6, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) There is exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter the sale of feminine
hygiene products.
(b) As used in this section, "feminine hygiene product":
(1) Means any product to be used by a woman with respect to
menstruation or other genital-tract secretions; and
(2) Includes tampons and sanitary napkins.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 1, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Upon request of a public school administrator, board, or director of schools,
the department of education shall ensure that feminine hygiene products are provided to,
and made available to students for free in, the public school.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Feminine hygiene product":
(A) Means any product to be used by a woman with respect to
menstruation or other genital-tract secretions; and
(B) Includes tampons and sanitary napkins; and
(2) "Public school" has the same meaning as defined in § 49-6-3502.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011033